Utah statutes.
78B-4-511.   Regulation of firearms reserved to state -- Lawsuits prohibited.

(1)  As prescribed by Section 76-10-500, all authority to regulate firearms is reserved to the state through the Legislature.

(2)  A person who lawfully designs, manufactures, markets, advertises, transports, or sells firearms or ammunition to the public may not be sued by the state or any of its political subdivisions for the subsequent use, whether lawfully or unlawfully, of the firearm or ammunition, unless the suit is based on the breach of a contract or warranty for a firearm or ammunition purchased by the state or political subdivision.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

